Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4205
Benefits plan, defined.

Benefits plan means the coverages to be offered by the pool to eligible individuals meeting the requirements of section 44-4221.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 5.